District of Columbia, session 26, PR26-0791.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
resolution may be cited as the “Community Schools Task Force Emergency Declaration
Resolution of 2026”.
Sec. 2. (a) The Community Schools Task Force (“Task Force”) was established as part of
the Community School Grant Program Amendment Act of 2026 in the Fiscal Year 2027 Budget
Support Act of 2026, enacted on August 14, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-418; 73 DCR 11735) (“BSA”) to
research, evaluate, and recommend changes to the Council for a more sustainable and intentional
model for full-service community schools. The Task Force will review national and local
community school models and best practices, and must submit a report to the Council with
recommendations by February 28, 2027, in advance of the Mayor’s submission of the Fiscal
Year 2028 budget. The Task Force is intended to have members with broad expertise in
community schools programming and the challenges facing students and families, including
expertise in national trends and multi-state research. Many individuals with such expertise reside
outside the District. However, the BSA provision establishing the Task Force inadvertently
limited eligibility for appointments to District residents only.
(b) Emergency legislation would amend the Community Schools Incentive Act of 2012,
effective June 19, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-142; D.C. Official Code § 38-754.03(i)(2)), and the
Community School Grant Program Amendment Act of 2026 to permit the appointment of non-
District residents in order to broaden the pool of researchers, principals, school leaders, and
academics with community schools expertise able to serve on the Task Force.
(c) There exists an immediate need for emergency legislation so that necessary
appointments can be made and the Task Force can meet the February 28, 2027 reporting
deadline.
Sec. 3. The Council of the District of Columbia determines that the circumstances
enumerated in section 2 constitute emergency circumstances making it necessary that the
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Community Schools Task Force Emergency Amendment Act of 2026 be adopted after a single
reading.
Sec. 4. This resolution shall take effect immediately.
2